test/src/morphology/N-tulli_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tuļļi: # Noun 189 'eng /est tulija/fin' - full paradigm
     tuļļi+N+Sg+Nom: tuļļi
     tuļļi+N+Sg+Gen: tuļļiz
     tuļļi+N+Sg+Par: tuļļizt
     tuļļi+N+Sg+Dat: tuļļijzõn
     tuļļi+N+Sg+Ins: tuļļizõks
     tuļļi+N+Sg+Ill: tuļļizõ
     tuļļi+N+Sg+Ela: tuļļizõst
     tuļļi+N+Pl+Nom: tuļļid
     tuļļi+N+Pl+Gen: tuļļid
     tuļļi+N+Pl+Par: tuļļidi
     tuļļi+N+Pl+Dat: tuļļidõn
     tuļļi+N+Pl+Ins: tuļļidõks
     tuļļi+N+Pl+Ill: tuļļiž
     tuļļi+N+Pl+Ela: tuļļisti
